Maryland, session 2025, HB0579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–104.
(a) In this section, “federal law enforcement officer” means an officer who may:
(1) make an arrest with or without a warrant for violations of the United
States Code; and
(2) carry firearms in the performance of the officer’s duties.
(c) (1) A federal law enforcement officer who acts under the authority granted
by this section shall notify the following persons of an investigation [or], AN enforcement
action, OR A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTION AT A SENSITIVE
LOCATION AS DEFINED IN § 6–111 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE:
(i) 1. the chief of police, if any, or chief’s designee, when in a
municipal corporation;
2. the police commissioner or police commissioner’s designee,
when in Baltimore City;
3. the chief of police or chief’s designee, when in a county
with a county police department, except Baltimore City;

HOUSE BILL 579 3
4. the sheriff or sheriff’s designee, when in a county without
a county police department;
5. the Secretary of Natural Resources or Secretary’s
designee, when on property owned, leased, operated by, or under the control of the
Department of Natural Resources; or
6. the chief of police of the Maryland Transportation
Authority or chief’s designee, when on property owned, leased, operated by, or under the
control of the Maryland Transportation Authority, Maryland Aviation Administration, or
Maryland Port Administration; and
(ii) the Department of State Police barrack commander or
commander’s designee, unless there is an agreement otherwise with the Department of
State Police.
(2) When the federal law enforcement officer participates in a joint
investigation with officials from a State or local law enforcement unit, the federal law
enforcement officer shall give the notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
reasonably in advance.
11–930.
(a) In this part the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Certifying entity” means:
(1) a State or local law enforcement agency;
(2) a State’s Attorney or deputy or assistant State’s Attorney;
(3) any other authority that has responsibility for the detection,
investigation, or prosecution of a qualifying crime or criminal activity; or
(4) an agency that has criminal, CIVIL, FAMILY, OR ADMINISTRATIVE
detection [or], investigative, OR PROSECUTORIAL jurisdiction in the agency’s respective
areas of expertise, including child protective services, ADULT PROTECTIVE SERVICES, the
Commission on Civil Rights, and the Maryland Department of Labor.
(c) “Certifying official” means:
(1) the head of a certifying entity;
(2) an individual in a supervisory role who has been specifically designated
by the head of a certifying entity to provide U Nonimmigrant Status certifications on behalf
of that entity; or

HOUSE BILL 579
(3) any other certifying official defined under Title 8, § 214.14(a)(3)(i) of the
Code of Federal Regulations.
(d) “FEDERAL U VISA NONIMMIGRANT STATUS PETITION GUIDELINES”
MEANS FEDERAL STATUTES, REGULATIONS, POLICIES, PUBLICATIONS, GUIDANCE,
AND INSTRUCTIONS RELATING TO U NONIMMIGRANT STATUS, INCLUDING 8 U.S.C.
§ 1101(A)(15)(U), 8 U.S.C. § 1184(O) § 1184(P), 8 U.S.C. § 1367, 72 FED. REG. 53014
(SEPT. 17, 2007), 8 C.F.R. § 214.14, 8 C.F.R. § 245.24, AND 8 U.S.C. § 1255(M)(1).
(E) “Qualifying crime” includes a criminal offense for which the nature and
elements of the offense are substantially similar to the criminal activity described in
subsection [(e)] (F) of this section and the attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit the
offense.
[(e)] (F) “Qualifying criminal activity” means criminal activity under §
1101(a)(15)(U)(iii) of the United States Code OR THAT IS DESCRIBED IN FEDERAL U VISA
NONIMMIGRANT STATUS PETITION GUIDELINES.
11–931.
(a) (1) For purposes of filing a petition with the United States Citizenship and
Immigration Services for U Nonimmigrant Status, a victim or the victim’s parent,
guardian, [or] next friend, ATTORNEY, VICTIM ADVOCATE, OR OTHER
REPRESENTATIVE may request a certifying official of a certifying entity to certify victim
helpfulness on a Form I–918, Supplement B certification if the victim:
[(1)] (I) was a victim of a qualifying criminal activity and has been
helpful, IS BEING HELPFUL, OR IS LIKELY TO BE HELPFUL [to the certifying entity] in
the detection, investigation, or prosecution, INCLUDING SENTENCING, of that qualifying
criminal activity;
[(2)] (II) was under the age of 16 years on the date that an act that
constitutes an element of qualifying criminal activity first occurred and the victim’s parent,
guardian, or next friend has been helpful to the certifying entity in the detection,
investigation, or prosecution, INCLUDING SENTENCING, of that qualifying criminal
activity; or
[(3)] (III) is incapacitated or incompetent and the victim’s parent,
guardian, or next friend has been helpful to the certifying entity in the detection,
investigation, or prosecution, INCLUDING SENTENCING, of that qualifying criminal
activity.
(2) (I) A VICTIM OF A QUALIFYING CRIME OR A QUALIFYING
CRIMINAL ACTIVITY IS ELIGIBLE FOR CERTIFICATION.

HOUSE BILL 579 5
(II) IF A VICTIM IS APPLYING FOR CERTIFICATION AS A RESULT
OF BEING A VICTIM OF MORE THAN ONE QUALIFYING CRIME OR QUALIFYING
CRIMINAL ACTIVITY, EACH QUALIFYING CRIME AND QUALIFYING CRIMINAL
ACTIVITY SHALL BE LISTED ON THE CERTIFICATION.
(b) FOR PURPOSES OF DETERMINING HELPFULNESS FOR A REQUEST FOR
CERTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, AN INDIVIDUAL SHALL
BE CONSIDERED HELPFUL IF, SINCE THE INITIATION OF HELPFULNESS, THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS NOT UNREASONABLY REFUSED TO COOPERATE OR UNREASONABLY
FAILED TO PROVIDE INFORMATION AND ASSISTANCE REASONABLY REQUESTED BY
A CERTIFYING ENTITY.
(C) For purposes of determining helpfulness under subsection (a) of this section,
if the victim or the victim’s parent, guardian, or next friend is assisting, has assisted, or is
likely to assist law enforcement authorities in the detection, investigation, or prosecution
of qualifying criminal activity, the victim or the victim’s parent, guardian, or next friend
shall be considered to be helpful, to have been helpful, or likely to be helpful.
[(c)] (D) If the victim or the victim’s parent, guardian, or next friend satisfies
the criteria specified under subsection (a) of this section, the certifying official shall fully
complete and sign the Form I–918, Supplement B certification and, with respect to victim
helpfulness, include:
(1) specific details about the nature of the crime DETECTED, investigated,
[or], prosecuted, OR SENTENCED;
(2) a detailed description of the victim’s PAST OR PRESENT helpfulness or
likely helpfulness to the detection, investigation, or prosecution, INCLUDING
SENTENCING, of the criminal activity; and
(3) copies of any documents in the possession of the certifying official that
evince the harm endured by the victim due to the criminal activity.
[(d)] (E) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
certifying entity shall certify or decline certification of the Form I–918, Supplement B
certification within 90 30 days after receiving a request under subsection (a) of this section.
(2) If a noncitizen victim is the subject of removal, exclusion, or deportation
proceedings or subject to a final order of removal, exclusion, or deportation, the certifying
entity shall certify or decline certification of the Form I–918, Supplement B certification
within 14 7 days after receiving a request under subsection (a) of this section.
[(e)] (F) A current investigation, the filing of charges, a prosecution, or a
conviction is not required for a victim or the victim’s parent, guardian, [or] next friend,

HOUSE BILL 579
ATTORNEY, VICTIM ADVOCATE, OR OTHER REPRESENTATIVE to request and obtain the
Form I–918, Supplement B certification under this section.
(G) THERE IS NO STATUTE OF LIMITATIONS FOR WHEN A QUALIFYING
CRIMINAL ACTIVITY OCCURRED RELATIVE TO THE REQUEST FOR CERTIFICATION OF
VICTIM HELPFULNESS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(H) IF THE CERTIFYING OFFICIAL CANNOT DETERMINE WHETHER THE
APPLICANT IS A VICTIM OF A QUALIFYING CRIMINAL ACTIVITY OR DETERMINES
THAT THE APPLICANT DOES NOT QUALIFY FOR CERTIFICATION, THE CERTIFYING
OFFICIAL SHALL PROVIDE A WRITTEN EXPLANATION TO THE VICTIM OR THE
VICTIM’S PARENT, GUARDIAN, NEXT FRIEND, ATTORNEY, VICTIM ADVOCATE, OR
OTHER REPRESENTATIVE SETTING FORTH REASONS WHY THE AVAILABLE EVIDENCE
DOES NOT SUPPORT ISSUANCE OF THE CERTIFICATION.
[(f)] (I) A certifying official may DENY OR withdraw the certification provided
under this section only [on refusal to provide information and assistance when reasonably
requested of:
(1) the victim; or
(2) the victim’s parent, guardian, or next friend if the victim was under the
age of 16 years on the date that an act that constitutes an element of qualifying criminal
activity first occurred or if the victim is incapacitated or incompetent] IF, AFTER
CONSIDERING THE TOTALITY OF THE CIRCUMSTANCES, THE PERSON PROVIDING
THE HELPFULNESS UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION UNREASONABLY
REFUSED TO COOPERATE OR UNREASONABLY FAILED TO PROVIDE INFORMATION
OR ASSISTANCE REASONABLY REQUESTED BY A CERTIFYING OFFICIAL.
(J) (1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, A
CERTIFYING OFFICIAL’S COMPLETION OF A CERTIFICATION FORM MAY NOT BE
CONSIDERED SUFFICIENT EVIDENCE THAT AN APPLICANT FOR A U OR A T VISA U
NONIMMIGRANT STATUS HAS MET ALL ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR THAT VISA
STATUS, AND COMPLETION OF A CERTIFICATION FORM BY A CERTIFYING OFFICIAL
MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO GUARANTEE THAT THE VICTIM WILL RECEIVE
IMMIGRATION RELIEF UNDER FEDERAL LAW.
(2) COMPLETION OF A CERTIFICATION FORM BY A CERTIFYING
OFFICIAL ONLY SERVES AS VERIFICATION OF THE FACTUAL INFORMATION
RELEVANT FOR A FEDERAL IMMIGRATION OFFICIAL TO DETERMINE ELIGIBILITY
FOR A U OR A T VISA U NONIMMIGRANT STATUS.

HOUSE BILL 579 7
(3) BY COMPLETING A CERTIFICATION FORM, THE CERTIFYING
OFFICIAL ATTESTS THAT THE INFORMATION IS TRUE AND CORRECT TO THE BEST OF
THE CERTIFYING OFFICIAL’S KNOWLEDGE.
(4) THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT THE MANNER IN WHICH A
CERTIFYING OFFICIAL OR CERTIFYING AGENCY MAY:
(I) DESCRIBE WHETHER THE PERSON HAS BEEN HELPFUL, IS
BEING HELPFUL, OR IS LIKELY TO BE HELPFUL TO THE CERTIFYING ENTITY; OR
(II) PROVIDE ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION THE CERTIFYING
OFFICIAL OR CERTIFYING ENTITY BELIEVES MIGHT BE RELEVANT TO THE
ADJUDICATION OF A U OR A T VISA APPLICATION NONIMMIGRANT STATUS
PETITION.
(K) A CERTIFYING ENTITY SHALL DEVELOP PROTOCOLS TO ASSIST
PETITIONERS WHO HAVE LIMITED ENGLISH PROFICIENCY TO PROCEED UNDER THIS
SECTION.
[(g) A certifying entity may disclose information relating to a victim who is seeking
or has obtained U Nonimmigrant Status only:
(1) in order to comply with federal law, court order, or a discovery
obligation in the prosecution of a criminal offense; or
(2) after adult petitioners for U Nonimmigrant Status or adult U
Nonimmigrant Status holders have provided written consent for the disclosure of the
information.
(h) (1) Except in cases of willful or wanton misconduct, a certifying entity or
certifying official who acts or fails to act in good faith in compliance with this section has
the immunity from liability described under § 5–643 of the Courts Article.
(2) A person who brings an action to seek enforcement of this section may
not be awarded attorney’s fees or costs unless the action demonstrates willful or wanton
misconduct by a certifying entity or certifying official.]
11–932.
(A) A CERTIFYING ENTITY OR A CERTIFYING OFFICIAL MAY DISCLOSE
INFORMATION RELATING TO A VICTIM WHO IS SEEKING CERTIFICATION, OR WHO IS
SEEKING OR HAS OBTAINED U NONIMMIGRANT STATUS ONLY:
(1) TO COMPLY WITH FEDERAL LAW, A COURT ORDER, OR A
DISCOVERY OBLIGATION IN THE PROSECUTION OF A CRIMINAL OFFENSE; OR

HOUSE BILL 579
(2) IF APPLICABLE, AFTER THE VICTIM HAS WAIVED
CONFIDENTIALITY PROTECTIONS UNDER THE VIOLENCE AGAINST WOMEN ACT
UNDER 34 U.S.C. § 12291(B)(2).
(B) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ALTER OR DIMINISH THE
DUTIES AND REQUIREMENTS OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, A STATE’S
ATTORNEY, OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL FROM DISCLOSING EXCULPATORY
INFORMATION TO A DEFENDANT IN A CRIMINAL CASE.
Article – State Government
6–111.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COLLATERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT” MEANS FEDERAL
IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS THAT AFFECT INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE NOT
THE PRIMARY TARGET OF THE ENFORCEMENT ACTION, BUT ARE PRESENT AT THE
LOCATION OF THE ENFORCEMENT ACTION.
(3) “IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT” MEANS FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
ENFORCEMENT ACTIONS.
(4) “SENSITIVE LOCATION” MEANS:
(I) A PUBLIC SCHOOL;
(II) A PUBLIC LIBRARY;
(III) A HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
(IV) A SHELTER; AND
(V) A PLACE OF WORSHIP.
(B) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DEVELOP AND PUBLISH GUIDANCE
THAT INFORMS THE PUBLIC AND RELEVANT STATE AGENCIES ABOUT:
(1) MAXIMIZING PUBLIC SAFETY AND MINIMIZING PUBLIC EXPOSURE
TO VIOLENCE OR ACCIDENTS FROM IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT CONDUCTED
USING FIREARMS AT SENSITIVE LOCATIONS;

HOUSE BILL 579 9
(2) MINIMIZING DISRUPTION TO SERVICES PROVIDED AT SENSITIVE
LOCATIONS FROM IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT CONDUCTED USING FIREARMS;
(3) DELINEATING BETWEEN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT WITHIN
THE PUBLIC PORTIONS OF SENSITIVE LOCATIONS AND THE NONPUBLIC OR PRIVATE
PORTIONS OF SENSITIVE LOCATIONS;
(4) VERIFYING THE IDENTITY OF IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
AGENTS AND VALIDATING IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT DOCUMENTATION SEEKING
SPECIFIC INDIVIDUALS;
(5) ALIGNING ARTICLE 26 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION,
WHICH REQUIRES THAT A WARRANT NAME A SPECIFIC INDIVIDUAL, WITH POLICIES
ABOUT COLLATERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT SENSITIVE LOCATIONS;
(6) LIMITING LIABILITY EXPOSURE FOR STATE, LOCAL, AND PRIVATE
INSTITUTIONS AND THE PARTICIPATION OF THE EMPLOYEES OF THOSE
INSTITUTIONS IN IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT SENSITIVE LOCATIONS;
(7) FACILITATING RELATIONSHIPS BETWEEN FEDERAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS AND STATE AND LOCAL OFFICIALS AND LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS IN ORDER TO CONDUCT IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT
ACTIVITIES THROUGH THE LEAST DANGEROUS AND DISRUPTIVE MEANS; AND
(8) COMPLYING WITH EXISTING LEGAL OBLIGATIONS AND
LIMITATIONS ON STATE AGENCIES WHILE MAINTAINING PUBLIC SAFETY AND
ACCESSIBILITY TO THOSE AGENCIES.
(C) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY DEVELOP AND PUBLISH GUIDANCE FOR
NONPUBLIC FACILITIES ABOUT IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT AT SENSITIVE
LOCATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.